test/src/morphology/comp-nouns_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Compound nouns. 

Tests:
  Noun - alkohåvllagássjelisvuohta: # MUORRA SgNom
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Nom: alkohåvllågássjelisvuohta 
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Gen: alkohåvllågássjelisvuoda
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Acc: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodav 
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Ine: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodan
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Ill: alkohåvllågássjelisvuohtaj
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Ela: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodas
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Com: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodajn
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Nom: alkohåvllågássjelisvuoda
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Gen: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodaj
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Acc: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodajt
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Ine: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodajn
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Ill: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodajda
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Ela: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodajs
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Com: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodaj
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Ess: alkohåvllågássjelisvuohtan
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    alkohåvllå+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Abe: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodadak

  Noun - juogosgirjje: # MUORRA SgNom
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Nom: juogosgirjje 
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Gen: juogosgirje
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Acc: juogosgirjev 
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Ine: juogosgirjen
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Ill: juogosgirjjáj
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Ela: juogosgirjes
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Com: juogosgirjijn
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Nom: juogosgirje
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Gen: juogosgirjij
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Acc: juogosgirjijt
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Ine: juogosgirjijn
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Ill: juogosgirjijda
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Ela: juogosgirjijs
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Com: juogosgirjij
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Ess: juogosgirjjen
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juogosgirjásj
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juogosgirjátjasj
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: juogosgirjedibme
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: juogosgirjálasj
    juogos+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#girjje+N+Abe: juogosgirjedak

  Noun - bijllajuogos: # ÅRES SgNom
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Nom: bijllajuogos 
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Gen: bijllajuohkusa
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Acc: bijllajuohkusav
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Ine: bijllajuohkusin
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Ill: bijllajuohkusij
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Ela: bijllajuohkusis
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Com: bijllajuohkusijn
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Nom: bijllajuohkusa
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Gen: bijllajuohkusij
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Acc: bijllajuohkusijt
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Ine: bijllajuohkusijn
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Ill: bijllajuohkusijda
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Ela: bijllajuohkusijs
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Com: bijllajuohkusij
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Ess: bijllajuohkusin
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bijllajuohkusasj
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bijllajuohkusattjasj
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: bijllajuohkusahtá
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    bijlla+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juogos+N+Abe: []

  Noun - giedjeklihtte: # MUORRA SgNom
    giedjek+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Nom: giedjeklihtte 
    giedjek+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ine: giedjeklihten 
    giedjek+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ill: giedjeklihttáj
    giedjek+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#lihtte+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: giedjeklihtásj

  Noun - giedjegalihtte: # MUORRA SgGen
    giedjek+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Nom: giedjegalihtte 
    giedjek+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ine: giedjegalihten 
    giedjek+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ill: giedjegalihttáj
    giedjek+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#lihtte+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: giedjegalihtásj

  Noun - giedjegijlihtte: # MUORRA PlGen
    giedjek+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Nom: giedjegijlihtte 
    giedjek+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ine: giedjegijlihten 
    giedjek+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ill: giedjegijlihttáj
    giedjek+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#lihtte+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: giedjegijlihtásj

  Noun -ednamdille: # NOADE 
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: ednamdille
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen: ednamdile
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ednamdiláma
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Acc: ednamdilev
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: ednamdilen 
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: ednamdilláj
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ela: ednamdiles
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Com: ednamdilijn 
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Nom: ednamdile
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Gen: ednamdilij
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Acc: ednamdilijt
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ine: ednamdilijn
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ill: ednamdilijda
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ela: ednamdilijs
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Com: ednamdilij
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Ess: ednamdillen
    ednam+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ednamdilásj

  Noun - ednamadille: # MUORRA
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: ednamadille 
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen: ednamadile
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ednamadiláma
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Acc: ednamadilev
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: ednamadilen 
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: ednamadilláj
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ela: ednamadiles
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Com: ednamadilijn 
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Nom: ednamadile
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Gen: ednamadilij
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Acc: ednamadilijt
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ine: ednamadilijn
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ill: ednamadilijda
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ela: ednamadilijs
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Com: ednamadilij
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Ess: ednamadillen
    ednam+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ednamadilásj

  Noun - ednamijdille: # MUORRA
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: ednamijdille 
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen: ednamijdile
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ednamijdiláma
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Acc: ednamijdilev
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: ednamijdilen 
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: ednamijdilláj
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ela: ednamijdiles
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Com: ednamijdilijn 
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Nom: ednamijdile
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Gen: ednamijdilij
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Acc: ednamijdilijt
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ine: ednamijdilijn
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ill: ednamijdilijda
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Ela: ednamijdilijs
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Pl+Com: ednamijdilij
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Ess: ednamijdillen
    ednam+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#dille+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ednamijdilásj

  Noun - ulmusjjuolgge: # MUORRA
    ulmusj+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Nom: ulmusjjuolgge
    ulmusj+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Pl+Nom: ulmusjjuolge
    ulmusj+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Ill: ulmusjjuolggáj
    ulmusj+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmusjjuolgásj
    ulmusj+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmusjjuolgátjasj
    ulmusj+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: ulmusjjuolgedibme
    ulmusj+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ulmusj+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Abe: ulmusjjuolgedak

  Noun - ulmustjajuolgge: # MUORRA
    ulmusj+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutjajuolgge
    ulmusj+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Pl+Nom: ulmutjajuolge
    ulmusj+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Ill: ulmutjajuolggáj
    ulmusj+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutjajuolgásj
    ulmusj+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutjajuolgátjasj
    ulmusj+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: ulmutjajuolgedibme
    ulmusj+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ulmusj+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Abe: ulmutjajuolgedak

  Noun - ulmutjijjuolgge: # MUORRA
    ulmusj+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutjijjuolgge
    ulmusj+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Pl+Nom: ulmutjijjuolge
    ulmusj+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Sg+Ill: ulmutjijjuolggáj
    ulmusj+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutjijjuolgásj
    ulmusj+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ulmutjijjuolgátjasj
    ulmusj+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: ulmutjijjuolgedibme
    ulmusj+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ulmusj+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#juolgge+N+Abe: ulmutjijjuolgedak

  Noun - dilletjåhkanibme: # VSBST-EVEN
    dille+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Nom: dilletjåhkanibme 
    dille+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Ine: dilletjåhkanimen 
    dille+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Ill: dilletjåhkanibmáj
    dille+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Noun - diletjåhkanibme: # VSBST-EVEN
    dille+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Nom: diletjåhkanibme
    dille+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Ine: diletjåhkanimen
    dille+N+SgGenCmp+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Ill: diletjåhkanibmáj

  Noun - dilijtjåhkanibme: # VSBST-EVEN
    dille+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Nom: dilijtjåhkanibme
    dille+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Pl+Nom: dilijtjåhkanime
    dille+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Sg+Ill: dilijtjåhkanibmáj
    dille+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []
    dille+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []
    dille+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    dille+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    dille+N+PlGenCmp+Cmp#tjåhkanibme+N+Abe: []

  Noun - tjåhkanimrámát: # GAHPER
    tjåhkanibme+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Nom: tjåhkanimrámát
    tjåhkanibme+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Ine: tjåhkanimrámádin
    tjåhkanibme+N+SgNomCmp+Cmp#rámát+N+Sg+Ill: tjåhkanimrámádij
